Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Governor

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relating to the governor, see art. 4, §§ 1 through 10, Wyo. Const.

As to the state advisory council on juvenile justice, see §

14-10-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Governor § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 98 to 101.

§ 9-1-201.
Chief executive officer; powers and duties generally.

In accordance with the Wyoming constitution, the governor is the chief executive officer of the state of Wyoming. The governor shall formulate and administer the policies of, and shall exercise general supervision, direction and control over the executive branch of state government.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-32.1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-119

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 309, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 2, effective July 1, 2004, authorizes the governor to employ a chief information officer who is to develop a plan for the organization of information technology activities for all executive and judicial branch agencies including the department of transportation and the game and fish department. The plan will categorize each information technology structure into an enterprise framework by function and will include the development of a system for creating common information technology architecture and standards, which lead to an efficient and effective use of funds. All executive branch agencies including the department of transportation and the game and fish department and all judicial branch agencies are to assist in developing the plan and provide any information requested by the chief information officer. The chief information officer is to submit the plan to the governor for approval and to the joint appropriations interim committee for review. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1005(a)(xii),

9-2-1018

,

9-2-1026

.1 and

9-2-2501

, for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006 for all executive branch agencies except the department of transportation and the game and fish department, the chief information officer's written approval is required prior to acquisition of any information technology software, hardware or services.

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided in art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

§ 9-1-202.
Removal of appointive officers and commissioners; reason for removal to be filed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise provided in this section, any person may be removed by the governor, at the governor’s pleasure, if appointed by the governor to serve as head of a state agency, department or division, or as a member of a state board or commission. The governor may only remove a member of the Wyoming business council as provided in W.S.

9-12-103

.

Any person who holds a state office or commission by appointment of the members of a state board, commission or administrator may be removed by:

The board, commission or administrator which appointed him where provided by law; or

The governor, for malfeasance or misconduct in office.

Reason for removal of appointed officers or commissioners shall be mailed or delivered to the person to be removed.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 45, § 3; 1905, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 210, 279; C.S. 1920, §§ 223, 318; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-1003, 109-1428; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-104, 18-1203; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-19, 9-250; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-101

, 9-3-1405; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1998, ch. 6, § 3.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relating to removal of officers, see art. 3, §§ 18, 19, Wyo. Const.

Constitutionality. —

This section does not violate the due process clause of the state constitution. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Legislative intent. —

It was the intention of the legislature that removals from office pursuant to this section might be made summarily, without notice or hearing. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Delegation of powers of removal to governor. —

In keeping with art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const., the legislature delegated certain powers of removal to the governor under this section. State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 401 P.2d 954,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1965).

There is no property right in a public office.

State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Summary removal of officer permitted. —

Under this section, the governor may act summarily and without notice or hearing, provided he complies with the requirements of filing the reason for removal. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Removal of state engineer. —

The state engineer may be removed by the governor under this section only for misconduct or malfeasance in office. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Article 8, § 5, Wyo. Const., creates the office of state engineer; art. 3, § 19, Wyo. Const., provides that all officers not subject to impeachment may be removed for misconduct or malfeasance in office as may be provided by law. Since the state engineer holds an office created by the constitution, he can be removed only for grounds mentioned therein, i.e., misconduct or malfeasance in office, and the legislature cannot add causes for removal. Insofar as this section attempts to do so with reference to the state engineer it is void. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

The state engineer is an executive officer appointed by and subject to removal by only the governor of In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

The state engineer is not subject to impeachment; neither the constitution nor the statutes contemplate that a district court should have the authority to remove or replace the state engineer as the administrator of Wyoming water. In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Myers v. United States, 272 U.S. 52, 47 S. Ct. 21, 71 L. Ed. 160, 1926 U.S. LEXIS 35 (1926).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conviction of offense under federal law or law of another country as vacating accused's holding of state or local office, or as grounds for removal, 20 ALR2d 732.

Injunction as remedy against removal of public officer, 34 ALR2d 554.

Constitutionality of removal of public officer or employee because of assertion of immunity, 44 ALR2d 789.

Removal of public officer for misconduct during previous term, 42 ALR3d 691.

§ 9-1-203.
Suspension of officer pending impeachment; filling vacancy.

When the house of representatives impeaches a state or judicial officer other than the governor, the governor may suspend the officer from his official functions pending the trial and other proceedings in the impeachment and may designate and appoint a qualified person to fill the office and discharge the duties thereof during the suspension.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 32, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 45; C.S. 1910, § 80; C.S. 1920, § 90; R.S. 1931, § 109-101; C.S. 1945, § 18-101; W.S. 1957, § 9-20; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to impeachment of governor, see §

9-1-214

.

For constitutional provisions as to impeachment, see art. 3, §§ 17 to 19, Wyo. Const.

As to when governor may fill vacancies in office generally, see art. 4, § 7, Wyo. Const.

For provision authorizing the legislature to provide for suspending an officer in his functions, pending impeachment, see art. 6, § 16, Wyo. Const.

§ 9-1-204.
Human services agencies.

As used in this section:

“Human services agency” means any division, institution and program within the department of health, the department of workforce services or the state department of family services and all institutions, boards and programs administering, planning and providing for state human services under the supervision of the director of the department of health, the director of the department of workforce services or the director of the department of family services;

“Human services program” means a program administered by a human services agency;

“Policy plan” means a plan formulated by the governor and reviewed by the legislature setting forth the policies of the state toward providing and coordinating services through all human service agencies;

“Program plan” means a plan for direction of each major human services program.

In order to coordinate policy planning for all state human services agencies, the governor may require:

Each of the human services agencies to prepare an annual program plan for its program offered or to be offered within the agency;

All program plans to be submitted by the agencies to the office of the state planning coordinator.

The office of the state planning coordinator shall:

Review all program plans;

Compile all program plans of the human services programs and present the compilation of plans to the governor;

Monitor the implementation of a policy plan which shall be used by the human services agencies in development of programs and budget preparation;

Review, on behalf of the governor, all grant applications and plans prepared by the agencies to ensure that all programs within the human services agencies comply with the state policy plan;

Coordinate with any other official efforts regarding state health planning in formulating a policy plan.

The governor shall:

Review, revise or adopt all program plans of programs within the state human services agencies;

Develop a policy plan reflecting the program plans of human service agencies;

Present the policy to the legislature for review.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-21.1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3; 2017 ch. 179, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (b) substituted “may” for “shall”.

Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

§ 9-1-205.
Authority of governor or legislature to require information from officers, commissions or boards; right of access to state offices for purpose of inspection.

The governor or either house of the legislature may require any state officer, commission or board of a state institution to communicate in writing any information concerning any subject pertaining to the office, commission or board.

The governor shall have free access to the office of any state officer for the inspection and examination of all books, papers, records and proceedings.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part II, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1695; Laws 1888, ch. 54, § 5; 1890, ch. 5, § 2; 1890-91, ch. 95, § 5; R.S. 1899, §§ 48, 49, 58, 71; C.S. 1910, §§ 83, 84, 95, 108; C.S. 1920, §§ 93, 94, 105, 118; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-104, 109-105, 109-205, 109-302; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-106, 18-109, 18-205, 18-303; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-22, 9-23, 9-37, 9-69; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1975, ch. 130, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-105

,

9-2-106

, 9-2-204, 9-2-331; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-206.
Administrative assistant; appointment; qualifications; term; compensation generally; duties; responsibility for acts.

The governor may employ an administrative assistant, who shall be a qualified elector of the state. He shall receive the compensation appropriated by the legislature and shall perform the duties required by the governor. The governor is responsible for the official acts of the administrative assistant and may remove an administrative assistant as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-24; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-107

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 9-1-207.
State planning coordinator; appointment; qualifications; term; removal; powers; duties.

The governor may employ a state planning coordinator, who shall be a qualified elector of the state and who may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

In fulfilling the provisions of W.S.

9-1-215

, the coordinator may sit as the governor’s personal representative on all nonconstitutionally created boards and commissions which are not exclusively licensing in nature. The coordinator shall have the right to speak on behalf of the governor but not to vote. The coordinator shall not sit as the governor’s personal representative for purposes of fulfilling the provisions of W.S.

9-1-215

on any boards or commissions on which one (1) or more of the other four (4) elective state officers sit.

The governor personally or through his coordinator may:

Cooperate with other states and the federal government and its agencies, and with all private concerns, to coordinate planning in the state of Wyoming;

Coordinate the planning activities of all state departments, boards, commissions and agencies in regard to economic, fiscal, educational, social, cultural, recreational and artistic development of the state, for the purpose of creation and implementation of a comprehensive state plan. All plans prepared by state departments, boards, commissions and agencies shall be submitted at least semiannually for review and comment by the coordinator;

Report to the legislature the comprehensive plan for economic and social development within the state of Wyoming.

The governor through the state planning coordinator shall:

Develop and advocate official state positions on federal land use issues regarding multiple use of federal lands in Wyoming based on each of the beneficial uses contributed to the state and to its people;

Actively monitor and request federal agencies to include the state government in the early planning stages of various federal land use management decisions;

Notify various individuals, interest and user groups and solicit from them their views regarding pending federal land management issues;

Utilize state agency expertise on specific issues, solicit and coordinate appropriate agency comments on pending federal land issues;

Review comments from individuals, interest and user groups and state agencies, as well as other sources of information and prepare, submit and advocate the state of Wyoming’s official position to federal land use management issues;

Prepare a biennial report to include:

Current state positions regarding federal land use management in Wyoming;

Activities of the state planning coordinator regarding federal land use management issues; and

Impacts of the federal land use management issues and decisions on the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 96, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-144.1 to 9-144.3; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-701

to 9-2-703; Laws 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 282, § 1; 2005, ch. 242, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

inserted “In fulfilling the provisions of W.S.

9-1-215

,” and “for purposes of fulfilling the provisions of W.S.

9-1-215

” in (b).

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Intent of act. —

Laws 1989, ch. 282, § 2, provides: “The intent of this act is to allow more direct involvement by the state of Wyoming in federal land planning and management. This act establishes a means for the state to more actively represent the state's interests on federal lands issues. The governor's office is directly charged with representing to the federal government Wyoming's long and short-term interests concerning federal lands. Implementation of this act should provide a balanced viewpoint about the state's economic and environmental future.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, ch. 160, § 1, authorizes the governor to enter into pilot projects with the federal government for the joint management of federal lands and provides for annual reports in the event of entering into such projects.

§ 9-1-208.
Prior approval of governor required.

No state department, board, commission or agency whose director, board or commission members are appointed by the governor shall, without prior approval of the governor:

Apply for federal funds or private endowment funds;

Contract with the federal government or any private association;

Effectuate and put into force any plan.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 96, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-144.4; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-704; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-1-209.
Coordinator of state-federal relations; appointment; removal; employment of personnel; duties; information to be supplied by agencies.

The governor may appoint a special assistant to be known as “the coordinator of state-federal relations”, hereinafter called “coordinator”. The coordinator may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The coordinator may employ personnel as the governor may approve.

The coordinator shall:

Review all federal legislative and administrative acts which pertain to state-federal relations;

Aid, assist and advise the governor on all federal aid and private endowment programs;

Coordinate assistance programs between the federal government and state and local government, and coordinate private and nonprofit organizations', agencies’ or foundations’ assistance to state and local government;

Collect data and information on federal aid and private endowment programs and maintain a central depository for the data and information relating to all programs, including the cost of the state or local participation. This information shall be available to all state agencies and units of local government;

Carry out all duties which the governor assigns, pertaining to federal funds.

All state departments, boards and commissions shall provide to the coordinator information and data requested by the coordinator, including cost of programs, of all federal aid or private endowment programs in which they participate. This information and data shall be supplied the coordinator within forty-five (45) days from the date of request unless more time is granted by the coordinator.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 113, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-144.5 to 9-144.7; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-801

to

9-2-803

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 9-1-210.
State authorized to accept gifts.

The state, through the governor may accept gifts, grants, funds or assistance from any federal, state or local governmental agencies or from any private source.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 188, § 6; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-144.8, 9-276.18:9; Laws 1969, ch. 113, § 4; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-804

, 9-3-1806; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-211.
Vacancy in office of governor; successor designated; order of succession; proclamation on succession.

If the governor is removed, dies, resigns or is unable to act, the state officer appearing highest on the following list who satisfies all constitutional qualifications for governor and is not under impeachment by the house of representatives shall act as governor until the disability of the governor is removed or a new governor is elected and qualified:

Secretary of state;

President of the senate;

Speaker of the house of representatives;

State auditor;

State treasurer;

State superintendent of public instruction;

Vice-president of the senate;

Speaker pro tem of the house of representatives.

If the powers and duties of the office of governor devolve upon any person named in subsection (a) of this section, that person shall issue a proclamation that the incumbent governor has ceased to act as governor, giving the reason, and stating that the person issuing the proclamation has assumed the duties and powers of the governor.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2, 4; R.S. 1899, §§ 50, 51, 53; C.S. 1910, §§ 85, 86, 88; C.S. 1920, §§ 95, 96, 98; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-106, 109-107, 109-109; Laws 1933, ch. 25, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-110, 18-111, 18-113; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-26, 9-27, 9-29; Laws 1961, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-109

,

9-2-110

,

9-2-112

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to secretary of state acting as governor upon death, resignation, removal or incompetency of governor, see art. 4, § 6, Wyo. Const.

§ 9-1-212.
Vacancy in office of governor; term of successor; when election held to fill unexpired term; requirements of elections; term of person elected.

Whenever the powers and duties of the office of the governor of the state of Wyoming devolve upon any other person as provided in W.S. 9-1-211(a), the person acting as governor shall continue to act as governor until the end of the term of the governor if the office is assumed less than sixty (60) days before the next general election. If the office is assumed more than sixty (60) days before a general election the person acting as governor shall issue an additional proclamation calling for the election of a governor to fill the unexpired term, which election shall take place at the same time as the general election, and the election, together with the returns and canvass thereof, shall be conducted in all respects as though it was an original election for governor. When the state canvassing board canvasses the vote of the election and declares a person at the election to be elected as governor, the person shall, within thirty (30) days after the canvass, or as soon thereafter as possible, qualify and assume the duties and powers of governor, and shall be the governor of the state of Wyoming for the remainder of the unexpired term of the governor.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 14, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 52; C.S. 1910, § 87; C.S. 1920, § 97; R.S. 1931, § 109-108; C.S. 1945, § 18-112; W.S. 1957, § 9-28; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-111

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cited

in

In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1893); State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903).

§ 9-1-213.
Governor's residence.

The state shall furnish a site and buildings which shall be used exclusively for the residence of the governor of the state during his incumbency in office.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 64, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 90; C.S. 1920, § 100; R.S. 1931, § 109-111; C.S. 1945, § 18-116; W.S. 1957, § 9-31; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-114

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For supervision and control of governor's residence, see §

9-5-103

.

§ 9-1-214.
Impeachment of governor; suspension from office; performance of duties.

When the house of representatives impeaches the governor, he is automatically suspended from performing the function of his office pending the trial and other proceedings in the impeachment. During the suspension the duties of the governor shall be performed as provided in W.S.

9-1-212

.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 32, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 46; C.S. 1910, § 81; C.S. 1920, § 91; R.S. 1931, § 109-102; C.S. 1945, § 18-102; W.S. 1957, § 9-32; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-118

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions as to impeachment, see art. 3, §§ 17 to 19, Wyo. Const.

As to acting governor in case of impeachment, see art. 4, § 6, Wyo. Const.

§ 9-1-215.
Right of governor to attend meetings; effect on quorum; designation of special meetings.

The governor may attend, participate in and vote at all meetings, both general and special, of all nonconstitutionally created boards and commissions of the state of Wyoming which are not exclusively licensing in nature. The governor’s presence or absence shall not affect the quorum. The governor may call and designate the time and place of special meetings.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 95, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-32.2; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-120

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-216.
Designation of agency or department to administer federally supported cooperative program.

The governor shall designate and authorize a state agency or department to administer any federally supported cooperative program in this state.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 95, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-32.3; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-121

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-217.
Appointments to federally-required committees; removal; functions, powers and duties of committees.

The governor may appoint electors of the state to any advisory, planning or action committee which is required by the state’s participation in federally supported programs. The functions, powers and duties of the committees shall not be inconsistent with the constitution or laws of this state. The governor may remove any appointee under this section as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 95, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-32.4; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-122

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 9-1-218.
Appointment to boards, commissions, or other bodies; appointment districts; requirement; conditions for appointments based on political party affiliation.

When required by law, members of boards, commissions, councils and other governmental bodies shall be appointed from the appointment districts set out in subsection (b) of this section.

The appointment districts are as follows:

Laramie, Goshen and Platte county comprise district 1;

Albany, Carbon and Sweetwater counties comprise district 2;

Lincoln, Sublette and Teton and Uinta counties comprise district 3;

Campbell, Johnson and Sheridan counties comprise district 4;

Big Horn, Hot Springs, Park and Washakie counties comprise district 5;

Crook, Niobrara and Weston counties comprise district 6;

Natrona, Fremont and Converse county comprise district 7.

Whenever a vacancy occurs, an appointment shall first be made from an appointment district which was not represented on the governmental body before the vacancy. If all districts were represented, the appointment shall be made so as to best equalize representation among the districts.

Unless otherwise provided by law, appointments shall rotate consecutively among all the counties of the appointment districts.

Any appointment made on or after July 1, 1996 by the governor to a state board, commission, council or committee created by law, for which senate confirmation is required by law or constitution and for which political party affiliation is specified by law, shall be conditioned upon membership in the same political party for not less than six (6) months prior to the date of appointment for temporary appointments made under W.S. 28-12-101(b) and not less than six (6) months prior to the date of nomination for appointment under W.S. 28-12-101(a). Prior to senate confirmation, the person appointed shall file in the office of the governor an affidavit acknowledged and sworn to under oath stating his party affiliation for the six (6) month period preceding the date of appointment. Filing a false statement may be cause for removal.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-863; W.S. 1977, §

9-20-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1996, ch. 85, § 1.

§ 9-1-219.
Bond limit allocation authority.

The governor shall establish rules and regulations to provide for the allocation of the private activity bond limit or the unified volume limitation, whichever is established by the United States Internal Revenue Code, among the governmental units in the state having authority to issue private activity bonds or nonessential governmental function bonds. The objective of the rules shall be to establish an accessible, equitable and efficient allocation process which advances the state and local benefits of tax-exempt financing. To the extent permitted by federal law, the rules may depart from federal allocation requirements, including requirements for housing bonds, redevelopment bonds and bonds issued by state and local bond issuing authorities.

Rulemaking under this section shall be subject to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 59, § 2.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 155, § 1; 1986, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, appears as 26 U.S.C.

§ 9-1-220.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 235, § 1, related to the coordinator of business permits.

§ 9-1-221.
Tribal liaison program; qualifications of liaisons; removal; duties.

There is created a tribal liaison program. The purpose of the program shall be to encourage mutual respect, understanding and leadership between the state and the Northern Arapaho tribe and the Eastern Shoshone tribe.

The governor shall select and employ two (2) persons to serve as tribal liaisons and to administer the tribal liaison program as provided in this section. Before making a selection, the governor shall solicit a list of nominations from the Eastern Shoshone business council and the Northern Arapaho business council. The selection of the liaisons shall be with the advice and consent of the senate in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. If the legislature has adjourned, the governor may make temporary selections in the manner provided for in W.S.

28-12-101

(b). Each liaison shall be a qualified elector of the state and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The liaisons shall:

Aid, assist and advise the governor on state-tribal relations including the coordination of programs and other activities between the state and tribal governments. The tribal liaisons may maintain offices within the state as directed by the governor;

Facilitate communication between the tribes and the office of the governor, executive branch agencies, the select committee on tribal relations and the legislature;

Stand for reappointment one (1) time every two (2) years unless sooner removed by the governor pursuant to W.S.

9-1-202

after consultation with the tribes.

The governor’s office, in conjunction with the tribal liaisons, shall report to the select committee on tribal relations on the successes, opportunities and future issues of the tribal liaison program on or before December 1 of each year.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 70, § 1; 2015 ch. 172, § 1, effective March 9, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

added (a) and (c); and rewrote (b).

Laws 2015, ch. 172, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 144, § 1, provides that, in addition to the duties described in §

9-1-221

, the tribal liaison is to consult with the governor and the select committee on tribal relations in developing an immediate action plan and a long-term state-tribal policy. For the purpose of implementing this provision and the provisions of § 9-2-221, the governor is authorized two full-time positions for the state-tribal liaison and staff. The act appropriates from the general fund to the office of the governor, not to exceed $120,000, for the purpose of funding the salary and administrative expenses for the state-tribal liaison program for the period beginning with the effective date of the act and ending June 30, 2006. A request to continue funding these two tribal liaison positions will be included in the governor's 2007-2008 biennium standard budget request.

Laws 2005, ch. 144, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

§ 9-1-222.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 2005, ch. 174, § 1,
2006, ch. 102, § 1, related to state chief information officer and duties.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 9-1-223.
Serve Wyoming; composition; powers and duties; definitions.

Serve Wyoming is transferred from the office of the governor to the department of workforce services and shall operate as a private not-for-profit corporation, as specified in this section.

The membership of Serve Wyoming shall be as provided in 42 U.S.C. 12638.

In addition to voting members appointed under subsection (b) of this section, there shall be at least one (1) ex officio nonvoting member of the corporation serving on Serve Wyoming. Other nonvoting members may be appointed as provided in 42 U.S.C. 12638.

Appointed members of Serve Wyoming shall serve terms of three (3) years and may be reappointed to serve additional terms. Voting members of Serve Wyoming shall elect a chairman and a vice chairman from among the voting members.

The purpose of Serve Wyoming shall be to:

Receive federal, state and private funds or donations;

Administer funds received under this subsection to foster community services, volunteerism, mentoring and literacy;

Develop and implement a comprehensive, statewide plan for promoting volunteer involvement and citizen participation in Wyoming;

Communicate and cooperate with national and state organizations that support the mission of Serve Wyoming;

Fulfill federal program administration requirements, including working with the corporation on national and community service to assist in the provision of health care and childcare for service program participants;

Submit annual state applications for federal funding for selected Americorps programs;

Monitor the performance and progress of programs receiving funds from Serve Wyoming;

Provide technical assistance to local not-for-profit organizations and other entities in planning programs, applying for funds and in implementing and operating high quality programs;

Develop mechanisms for recruitment and placement of people interested in participating in service programs;

Delegate nonpolicy making duties to a public or private not-for-profit organization, subject to requirements that the corporation on national and community service may prescribe.

As used in this section:

“Corporation” means the corporation on national and community service created by the National and Community Service Act of 1990;

“Serve Wyoming” means the not-for-profit corporation within the department of workforce services to implement the purposes of the National and Community Service Act of 1990.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 197, § 1; 2010, ch. 65, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “office of the governor to the department of workforce services” for “department of workforce services to the office of the governor”; and in (f)(ii), substituted “department of workforce services” for “governor's office.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 197, § 4, provides: “Any appointment to Serve Wyoming made prior to July 1, 2009 shall continue for the period of the appointment and may be renewed as provided by W.S. 9-1-223(d), created by section 1 of this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 197, § 3, provides: “There is appropriated seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00) from the general fund to the governor's office. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2009 and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of funding the administrative costs incurred by Serve Wyoming. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 197, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.